Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4935
Filing of applications; limitation.

There shall be no project applications filed on or after February 1, 2000, without further authorization of the Legislature, except that all project applications and all project agreements pending, approved, or entered into before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 35;

Laws 1997, LB 344, § 3.